Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.010

Date of regular sessions.

Regular sessions of the legislature shall be held annually, commencing on the second Monday of January.

[ 1980 c 87 s 27; 1979 ex.s. c 48 s 1; 1891 c 20 s 1; RRS s 8177.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 48: "This 1979 act shall take effect on January 1, 1980, if the proposed amendment to Article II, section 12 of the state Constitution by Substitute Senate Joint Resolution No. 110, providing for annual sessions of the legislature, is validly submitted and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November, 1979. If the proposed amendment is not so approved and ratified, this 1979 act shall be null and void in its entirety." [ 1979 ex.s. c 48 s 2.] "This 1979 act" refers to the amendment to RCW 44.04.010 by 1979 ex.s. c 48. Substitute Senate Joint Resolution No. 110 was approved and ratified by the people at the November 6, 1979, general election.

Regular and special sessions: State Constitution, Art. 2 s 12.